Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,101
Proceeds and expenses.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section:

(a) Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, belong to the limited cooperative association and not to the derivative plaintiff; and

(b) If the derivative plaintiff receives any proceeds, the derivative plaintiff shall immediately remit them to the limited cooperative association.

(2) If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, from the recovery of the limited cooperative association.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 101.